src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! !!Cases for тнэ
LEXICON NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION-TNE2
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Pl+Nom+Def:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@тнэ _KUDO-NomPl-Conjugation ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Pl+Gen+Def:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@тнэ%>нь K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Pl+Dat+Def:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@тнэ%>нень K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.ABL@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Pl+Abl+Def:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.ABL@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@тнэ%>де _KUDO-Conjugation ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.ELA@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Pl+Ela+Def:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.ELA@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@тнэ%>стэ _KUDO-Conjugation ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.ILL@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Pl+Ill+Def:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.ILL@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@тнэ%>с K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.INE@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Pl+Ine+Def:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.INE@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@тнэ%>сэ _KUDO-Conjugation ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.PRL@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Pl+Prl+Def:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.PRL@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@тнэ%>Г2а _KUDO-Conjugation ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.CMP@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Pl+Cmpr+Def:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.CMP@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@тнэ%>шка _KUDO-Conjugation ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.COM@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Pl+Com+Def:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.COM@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@тнэ%>нек NounEnd_K-lak ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.ABE@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Pl+Abe+Def:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.ABE@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@тнэ%>втеме _KUDO-Conjugation ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.TRA@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Pl+Tra+Def:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.TRA@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@тнэ%>кс _OSH-Conjugation ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.LAT@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Pl+Lat+Def:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.LAT@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@тнэ%>в K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.COM@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial/NW+Pl+Com+Def:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.COM@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@тнэ%>нек NounEnd_K-lak ;



LEXICON _KAL-SecondaryDeclination
:%>%{оеэØ%} SecondaryDeclination_1RequiresVowel ;
 SecondaryDeclination_1RequiresNoVowel ;

LEXICON _KIT-SecondaryDeclination
:%>%{оеэØ%} SecondaryDeclination_1RequiresVowel ;
 SecondaryDeclination_1RequiresNoVowel ;

LEXICON _LAK-SecondaryDeclination
:%>%{оеэØ%} SecondaryDeclination_1RequiresVowel ;
 SecondaryDeclination_1RequiresNoVowel ;

LEXICON _KUDO-SecondaryDeclination
 SecondaryDeclination ;

LEXICON SecondaryDeclination
:%> SecondaryDeclination_1RequiresVowel ;
 SecondaryDeclination_1RequiresNoVowel ;

LEXICON SecondaryDeclination_1RequiresVowel
+Sg+Def+Nom:сь  _OSH-Tenses1_Prep-SG ;
+Sg+Def+Gen:нть K ;
+Sg+Def+Dat:нтень K ;
+Sg+Tra+Def:%>кс _OSH-SecondaryDeclination_SgDet-PossPx ;

LEXICON SecondaryDeclination_1RequiresNoVowel
+Sg+Prl+Def:%>Г2а SecondaryDeclination_SgDet-PossPx ;
+Sg+Abe+Def:%>вт%{оеэ%}мО1 SecondaryDeclination_SgDet-PossPx ;
+Sg+Abl+Def:%>дО1 SecondaryDeclination_SgDet-PossPx ;
+Sg+Ine+Def:%>с%{оэØ%} SecondaryDeclination_SgDet-PossPx ;
+Sg+Ela+Def:%>ст%{оэØ%} SecondaryDeclination_SgDet-PossPx ;
+Sg+Cmpr+Def:%>шка SecondaryDeclination_SgDet-PossPx ;

 K ;
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>т%{ЬØ%} K ;
+Pl+Nom+Def:%>тнЕ3 K ; 
+Pl+Abl+Def:%>тнЕ3%>де K ;
+Pl+Abe+Def:%>тнЕ3%>с K ;
+Pl+Cmpr+Def:%>тнЕ3%>шка K ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тнЕ3%>нь K ;
+Pl+Dat+Def:%>тнЕ3%>нень K ;
+Pl+Ill+Def:%>тнЕ3%>с K ;
+Pl+Ine+Def:%>тнЕ3%>сэ K ;
+Pl+Ela+Def:%>тнЕ3%>стэ K ;
+Pl+Tra+Def:%>тнЕ3%>кс K ;
+Pl+Prl+Def:%>тнЕ3%>ва K ;


LEXICON SecondaryDeclination_SgDet-PossPx
+Sg+Def:%>нть K ; 
 K ; 

LEXICON _OSH-SecondaryDeclination_SgDet-PossPx
+Sg+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}нть K ; 
 K ; 







!LEXICON Nouns1_A
! Possessive-NomGen ;

!+Abe:%>вт%{оеэ%}мО1 _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Abl:%>дО1 _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Cmpr:%>%{оеэØ%}шка _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Prl:%>Г2а _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Tra:%>%{оеэØ%}кс _OSH-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Ill:%>%{оеэØ%}з _OSH-Possessive-Before-K ;

!+TempCx+Indef:%>не K ;
!+Lat+Indef:%>%{оеэØ%}в K ;

!+Dat+Indef:%>нень K ;
! DAT-PX ;
!+Sg+Nom+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}сь K ;
!+Sg+Nom+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}сь CLT/COP_SG ;
!+Sg+Gen+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}нть K ;
!+Sg+Dat+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}нтень K ;

!+Gen+Indef:%>%{оеэØ%}нь _KAL-Tenses-Obl ;
!+Com+Indef:%>нек K-lak ;

!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ill:%>з _OSH-Possessive-Before-K ;
!+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:%>з%{оэØ%} K ;
!+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:%>з%{оэØ%} CLT/COP_SG ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Nom+PxPl1:%>н%{оеэ%}к _LAK-Tenses-NomSg ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Gen+PxPl1:%>н%{оеэ%}к _LAK-Tenses-Obl ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Sg+Nom+Def:%>сь K ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Sg+Nom+Def:%>сь CLT/COP_SG ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Sg+Gen+Def:%>сть K ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Sg+Dat+Def:%>стень K ;


!! Nouns1S_A
!HERE

!LEXICON Nouns1S_A_ReqVow
! Possessive-NomGen ;

!+Ine:%>%{оеэØ%}%>с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Ela:%>%{оеэØ%}%>ст%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Cmpr:%>%{оеэØ%}шка _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Ill:%>%{оеэØ%}%>с K ;

!+Lat+Indef:%>%{оеэØ%}в K ;


!+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Ela:%>ст%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Cmpr:%>шка _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Tra:%>%{оеэØ%}кс _OSH-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Ill:%>с K ;

!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Sg+Gen+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}сть K ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Sg+Dat+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}стень K ;

! DAT-PX ;

!+Sg+Nom+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}сь K ;
!+Sg+Nom+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}сь CLT/COP_SG ;
!+Sg+Gen+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}нть K ;
!+Sg+Dat+Def:%>%{оеэØ%}нтень K ;
!+Gen+Indef:%>%{оеэØ%}нь _KAL-Tenses-Obl ;



!LEXICON Nouns1S_A_NoReqVow
!+Abl:%>дО1 _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Prl:%>Г2а _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
!+Abe:%>вт%{оеэ%}мО1 _KUDO-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;

!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Dat+PxSg2:%>теть K ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Dat+PxSg2:%>те K ;
!+Dat+PxSg2:%>тень K ;
!+Dat+PxSg1:%>нень K ;


!+Dat:%>нень K ;
!+Com:%>нек K-lak ;
!+TempCx:%>не K ;
!!!This one would render voiceless "s"
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Ill:%>з OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:%>з%{оэØ%} K ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:%>з%{оэØ%} CLT/COP_SG ;
!Nouns_Pl ;





!LEXICON istja-Gen-Attributes
! K ; !!= * __@CODE@__ This means that stem is word final 
!+Abl+Indef:%>дО1 K ;
!+Der/GenAttr:%>нь _KAL-Tenses-Obl ;
!+Der/GenAttr:%>н N2Dem-SE ;
!+Orth/Morph+Der/GenAttr:%>нь%> N2Dem-SE ; ! _ь_ retension through double %>%>
!+Orth/PhonInfl+Der/Oncje:%>нце _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;


!LEXICON chop-Gen-Attributes
! pek-Gen-Attributes ;

!LEXICON pek-Gen-Attributes
! K ; !!= * __@CODE@__ This means that stem is word final 
!+Abl+Indef:%>дО1 K ;
! GEN-INDEF-LIKE-DERIVATION ;

!LEXICON GEN-INDEF-LIKE-DERIVATION
!+Der/GenAttr:%>%{оеэØ%}нь _KAL-Tenses-Obl ;
!+Der/GenAttr:%>%{оеэØ%}н N2Dem-SE ;
!+Orth/Morph+Der/GenAttr:%>%{оеэØ%}нь%> N2Dem-SE ; ! _ь_ retension through double %>%>
!+Orth/PhonInfl+Der/Oncje:%>%{оеэØ%}нце _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;


LEXICON _KUDO-Possessives2-Ill
 _KUDO-Possessives2 ;
+NoVowX+Ill:%>з _OSH-Possessive-Before-K ;

!LEXICON _KAL-Possessives2
! Possessives2-PxSg1 ;
! Possessives2-PxSg2 ;
! Possessives2-PxSg3 ;
! Possessives2-PxPl1 ;
! Possessives2-PxPl2 ;
! Possessives2-PxPl3 ;

! These are possessor Indices for non-nominative singular
! NonNomSg
!LEXICON _OSH-Possessives2
! Possessives2-PxSg1 ;
! Possessives2-PxSg2 ;
! Possessives2-PxSg3 ;
! Possessives2-PxPl1 ;
! Possessives2-PxPl2 ;
! Possessives2-PxPl3 ;

LEXICON _KUDO-Possessives2
 Possessives2-PxSg1 ;
 Possessives2-PxSg2 ;
 Possessives2-PxSg3 ;
 Possessives2-PxPl1 ;
 Possessives2-PxPl2 ;
 Possessives2-PxPl3 ;

LEXICON _KAL-Determinatives1
: N2Dem-SE ;
+Err/Orth+Der+Der/sje:%>це _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
 _KAL-Tenses-Obl ;

LEXICON _KIT-Determinatives1
: N2Dem-SE ;
+Err/Orth+Der+Der/sje:%>це _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
 _KIT-Tenses-Obl ;

LEXICON _LAK-Determinatives1
 N2Dem-SE ; ! +Der+Der/sje:%>се _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Err/Orth+Der+Der/sje:%>це _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
 _LAK-Tenses-Obl ;


LEXICON _KUDO-Determinatives1
 N2Dem-SE ; !+Der+Der/sje:%>се _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension
+Err/Orth+Der+Der/sje:%>це _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
 _KUDO-Tenses-Obl ;

!LEXICON Dem_
!+Pron+Dem: K ; 

LEXICON DEM_ALCE
+Spat+Der+Der/sje: _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;

LEXICON letter-F ! this needs fixing front vowel
+Prop:%- PROP_KUDO ;

LEXICON letter-B ! this needs fixing back vowel
+Prop:%- PROP_KUDO ;
